test/src/gt-desc-yamls/proper-even_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Even syllable propers belonging to MARJA-U-plc, MARJA-I-plc, BERN-ani,
# DUBAI-sur, HEANDARAT-plc, VARGGAT-plc, ALEUHTAT-plc, ACCRA-plc, NIKOSIIJA-obj,
# NYSTØ, C-FI-NEN-sur, RONDANE-obj

Tests:
  Proper - Klareatnu: # MARJA-U-plc
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Klareatnu
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Klareanu
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Klaretnui
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Klareanus, Klareanun]
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: klareatnulažžii
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: klareatnulaččaid

  Proper - Klemmoaivi: # MARJA-I-plc
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Klemmoaivi
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Klemmoaivvi
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Klemmoaivái
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Klemmoaivvis, Klemmoaivvin]
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: klemmoaivilažžii
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: klemmoaivilaččaid
    
  Proper - Kerberos: # BERN-ani
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kerberos
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Kerberosa, Kerberos]
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kerberosii
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Kerberosas, Kerberosan]

  Proper - Stai: # DUBAI-sur
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Stai
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Staija, Stai]
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Staijii
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Staijas, Staijas]

  Proper - Sieinnus-Návggastat: # HEANDARAT-plc
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Sieinnus-Návggastat
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Sieinnus-Návggastaga
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Sieinnus-Návggastahkii
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Sieinnus-Návggastagas, Sieinnus-Návggastagan]

  Proper - Šleađut: # VARGGAT-plc
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Šleađut
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: [Šleađuid, Šleađut]
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Šleađuide
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Šleađuin
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: šleađutlažžii
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: šleađutlaččaid

  Proper - Doaresdievát: # ALEUHTAT-plc
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Doaresdievát
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: [Doaresdieváid, Doaresdievát]
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Doaresdieváide
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Doaresdieváin
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: doaresdievátlažžii
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: doaresdievátlaččaid

  Proper - Románia: # ACCRA-plc
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Románia
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Románia
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Romániai
    Románia+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Románias, Románian]
    Románia+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: románialažžii
    Románia+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: románialaččaid

  Proper - Kaffegalleriija: # NIKOSIIJA-obj
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kaffegalleriijai
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Kaffegalleriijas, Kaffegalleriija]

  Proper - Bergsjø: # NYSTØ
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Bergsjø
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Bergsjø, Bergsjøa, "Bergsjø:", "Bergsjø:a", Bergsjø-, Bergsjø-a, Bergsjø', Bergsjø'a]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Bergsjøi, Bergsjøii, Bergsjøai, "Bergsjø:ai", "Bergsjø:j", "Bergsjø:ii", Bergsjø-ai, Bergsjø-j, Bergsjø-ii, Bergsjø'ai, Bergsjø'j, Bergsjø'ii]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Bergsjøs, Bergsjøn, "Bergsjø:s", Bergsjøas, "Bergsjø:as", Bergsjø-s, Bergsjø-as, Bergsjø's, Bergsjø'as, "Bergsjø:n", Bergsjøan, "Bergsjø:an", Bergsjø-n, Bergsjø-an, Bergsjø'n, Bergsjø'an]

  Proper - Sottinen: # C-FI-NEN-sur
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Sottinen
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Sottinena, Sottisa, Sottinen]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Sottinenii, Sottisii]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [Sottinenas, Sottisis]

  Proper - BackOffice: # RONDANE-obj
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: BackOfficii
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: [BackOffices, BackOfficen]
